Tennessee, session 114, SB1597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-3-502(i)(9), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(9) As used in this subsection (i), "next of kin" means:
(A) The person who has the highest priority pursuant to § 62-5-703; and
(B) In addition to the person described in subdivision (i)(9)(A), a surviving
parent of the decedent.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-3-205, is amended by deleting
subdivision (d)(2)(D)(i) and substituting:
(i) Upon specific request of:
(a) The decedent's spouse, child, parent, or other next of kin;
(b) The other parent of a child of the decedent if the child is under
eighteen (18) years of age; or
(c) The authorized representative of a person listed in subdivision
(d)(2)(D)(i)(a) or (b);
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1597
009407
- 1 -